Louisiana, session 2026, HB91.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 717(E) and (F) are hereby enacted
to read as follows:
Art. 717. Disclosure by the state; criminal records of defendant and witnesses;
inducements to the state's witnesses
* * *
E. The provisions of this Article do not authorize the disclosure of
information that is directly derived from either of the following:
(1) The criminal history databases maintained by the Criminal Justice
Information Services Division of the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
(2) The Louisiana Computerized Criminal History System operated by the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections if the witness is an employee of a
criminal justice agency and his identity is exempt from disclosure in accordance with
R.S. 44:3(A)(4)(a) and Article 729.7(A) of this Code.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-688 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 91
F. In accordance with the provisions of R.S. 15:579 and 584, R.S.
44:3(A)(4)(a), and the National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact, 34 U.S.C.
40316, any information described in Paragraph E of this Article that is obtained for
use at trial and pertains to the criminal history of any witness shall not be
disseminated outside the purview of the presiding court nor included in any court
record that may be subject to public disclosure.